Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2314
Quarantine; department; powers.

(1) In order to prevent, suppress, control, and eradicate dangerous transmissible diseases among the domesticated cervine animals of this state, the department may place in quarantine any county, or part of any county, any private premises, or any private or public stockyards and may quarantine any domesticated cervine animal infected with such disease or which has been or is suspected of having been exposed to such disease. Such animals shall remain under quarantine until released by the department. An infected animal may be destroyed as provided in the Animal Health and Disease Control Act.

(2) The department may regulate or prohibit the arrival into, departure from, and movement within the state of any domesticated cervine animal infected with a dangerous transmissible disease or exposed or suspected of having been exposed to such disease.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 13;

Laws 2020, LB344, § 77.
November 14, 2020
Animal Health and Disease Control Act, see section 54-2901.